Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-205.01
Judicial Branch Education Advisory Committee; powers.

(1) The Supreme Court may appoint a Judicial Branch Education Advisory Committee.

(2) The Judicial Branch Education Advisory Committee may:

(a) Develop for review by the Supreme Court standards and rules and regulations addressing such issues as the criteria for mandatory education for judges, criteria for approval of qualified activities, reporting requirements, sanctions for noncompliance, exemptions, and confidentiality of records;

(b) Develop for review by the Supreme Court standards and policies for education and training of all nonjudge judicial branch employees, including criteria for approval of qualified activities, reporting requirements, sanctions for noncompliance, and exemptions;

(c) Make recommendations to the State Court Administrator regarding budget requests and pursue grant funding;

(d) Develop for review by the Supreme Court policies regarding funding for travel and other related educational expenses for all employees for both instate and out-of-state travel; and

(e) Participate in additional activities as assigned by the Supreme Court in order to promote excellence in the administration of justice through quality education.

Laws 2003, LB 760, § 2.

Under subsection (1) of section 84-712.01, the Judicial Branch Education advisory committee's unwritten policy of keeping its records confidential did not, in light of this section, governing the committee's power to develop standards and policies for review by the Nebraska Supreme Court, render such records confidential under the statutory exception to the public records laws for records not to be made public according to section 84-712.01, although subdivision (2)(a) of this section contemplated promulgation of rules regarding the confidentiality of Judicial Branch Education records, where no such rules had been adopted by the Nebraska Supreme Court. State ex rel. Veskrna v. Steel, 296 Neb. 581, 894 N.W.2d 788 (2017).